Washington statutes.
RCW 19.80.075

Collection and deposit of fees.

All fees collected by the department under this chapter must be deposited with the state treasurer and credited to the business license account.

[ 2013 c 144 s 33; 2011 c 298 s 17; 1992 c 107 s 6; 1984 c 130 s 9.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Intent—Agency transfer—Contracting—Effective date—2011 c 298: See notes following RCW 19.02.020.

Effective dates—1992 c 107: See note following RCW 19.02.020.

Effective date—1984 c 130: See note following RCW 19.80.001.